Utah statutes.
77-8-4.   Record of proceedings -- Access by suspect.

The entire lineup procedure shall be recorded, including all conversations between the witnesses and the conducting peace officers. The suspect shall have access to and may make copies of the record and any photographs taken of him or any other persons in connection with the lineup.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

